resources/code/morph/tur/tur.lexc
!
! COGS 532 Theoretical Linguistics
!
! Umut Özge
! METU Informatics
!

Multichar_Symbols
+N
+Sg
+Pl
+Poss1p
+Poss2p
+Poss3p
+Poss1pPl
+Poss2pPl
+Poss3pPl
+NonPoss
+Nom
+Acc
+Dat
+Abl
+Loc

LEXICON Root

Noun;

LEXICON Noun

araba	NPos;
arac    NPos;
ev	NPos;
ütü	NPos;
gözlük	NPos;
kolye	NPos;
süt	NPos;
korku	NPos;
atom	NPos;
varış	NPos;
kitab   NPos;
ip	NPos;
çöp	NPos;
çap     NPos;
ceb	NPos;
kab     NPos; 
kaş     NPos; 
kat     NPos; 
tad     NPos; 

LEXICON NPos

+N:0	Num;

LEXICON Num

+Sg:0		Agr;
+Pl:^lAr	AgrPlu;

LEXICON Agr

+Poss1p:^Hm		Case;
+Poss2p:^Hn		Case;
+Poss3p:^SHN		Case;
+Poss1pPl:^HmHz		Case;
+Poss2pPl:^HnHz		Case;
+Poss3pPl:^SHN		Case;
+Poss3pPl:^lArIN	Case;
+NonPoss:0		Case;

LEXICON AgrPlu

+Poss1p:^Hm	Case;
+Poss2p:^Hn	Case;
+Poss3p:^SHN	Case;
+Poss1pPl:^HmHz	Case;
+Poss2pPl:^HnHz	Case;
+Poss3pPl:^SHN	Case;
+NonPoss:0	Case;

LEXICON Case

+Nom:0		#;
+Acc:^YH	#;
+Dat:^YA	#;
+Abl:^DAn	#;
+Loc:^DA	#;
+Ins:^YlA	#;
!+Gen:^NHn	#;
